Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.030

Director—Appointment—Salary.

The executive head of the department shall be the director. The director shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall be paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.

[ 1993 c 280 s 5.]